Hawaii statutes.
§708-832 Theft in the third degree. (1)
A person commits the offense of theft in the third degree if the person commits
theft:

(a) Of property or services the value of which
exceeds $250; or

(b) Of gasoline, diesel fuel, or other related
petroleum products used as propellants of any value not exceeding $750.

(2) Theft in the third degree is a
misdemeanor. [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L 1974, c 201, §2 and c 242, §2; am L
1979, c 106, §7; am L 1986, c 314, §65; am L 2006, c 230, §38; am L 2016, c
231, §38]

Case Notes

Jury instructions on the lesser included offenses of theft in
the third degree under this section and theft in the fourth degree under
§708-833 should have been given where jury could have found that petitioner
committed theft of not only less than $20,000, but less than $300 or less than
$100, making the offenses of theft III or theft IV applicable. 122 H. 271, 226
P.3d 441 (2010).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next